Maryland, session 2026, HB0019.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 42. MARYLAND PUBLIC SERVICE LOAN FORGIVENESS PROGRAM.
18–4201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0019*

HOUSE BILL 19
(B) “ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED BY THE
STATE IN THE EXECUTIVE, LEGISLATIVE, OR JUDICIAL BRANCH.
(C) “HIGHER EDUCATION LOAN” MEANS ANY LOAN FOR UNDERGRADUATE
OR GRADUATE STUDY THAT IS OBTAINED FOR TUITION, EDUCATIONAL EXPENSES,
OR LIVING EXPENSES FROM:
(1) A COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY, GOVERNMENT, OR COMMERCIAL
SOURCE; OR
(2) AN ORGANIZATION, AN INSTITUTION, AN ASSOCIATION, A
SOCIETY, OR A CORPORATION THAT IS EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3)
OR (4) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE OF 1986.
(D) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND PUBLIC SERVICE LOAN
FORGIVENESS PROGRAM.
18–4202.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND PUBLIC SERVICE LOAN FORGIVENESS
PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ATTRACT, RECRUIT, AND RETAIN
STATE EMPLOYEES.
(C) THE OFFICE SHALL DISTRIBUTE FUNDS FROM THE PROGRAM TO ASSIST
IN THE REPAYMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION LOANS OWED BY AN ELIGIBLE
EMPLOYEE WHO:
(1) RECEIVED AN UNDERGRADUATE, GRADUATE, OR PROFESSIONAL
DEGREE FROM AN ACCREDITED COLLEGE OR UNIVERSITY IN THE STATE;
(2) HAS BEEN EMPLOYED BY THE STATE FOR AT LEAST 10
CUMULATIVE YEARS; AND
(3) SATISFIES ANY OTHER CRITERIA ESTABLISHED BY THE OFFICE.
18–4203.
(A) SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF FUNDS, THE AWARD AMOUNT UNDER
THE PROGRAM SHALL BE 100% OF THE ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE’S REMAINING TOTAL
HIGHER EDUCATION LOAN DEBT.

HOUSE BILL 19 3
(B) AN AWARD UNDER THE PROGRAM SHALL BE USED ONLY FOR
REPAYMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION LOANS OWED BY THE ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE.
18–4204.
THE DEPARTMENT OF BUDGET AND MANAGEMENT SHALL PROVIDE
INFORMATION ABOUT THE PROGRAM TO STATE EMPLOYEES.
18–4205.
(A) THE OFFICE SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) THE REGULATIONS SHALL ESTABLISH THAT PRIORITY FOR
PARTICIPATION IN THE PROGRAM SHALL BE GIVEN TO AN ELIGIBLE EMPLOYEE WHO
GRADUATED FROM:
(1) AN INSTITUTION WITHIN THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF
MARYLAND; OR
(2) AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION WHERE AT LEAST 40%
OF THE ENROLLED STUDENTS ARE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE FEDERAL PELL GRANTS.
18–4206.
SUBJECT TO § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE OFFICE
SHALL REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR
ON:
(1) THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM; AND
(2) ANY EFFECTS THE PROGRAM HAS ON STATE EMPLOYEE
RECRUITMENT OR RETENTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.